Massachusetts, session 194th, H4454.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Department of Correction 
shall establish a sick leave bank for John C. Murphy, an employee of the Department. Any 
employee of the Department may voluntarily contribute 1 or more sick, personal or vacation 
days to the sick leave bank for use by John C. Murphy. If John C. Murphy terminates 
employment with the Department or requests to dissolve the sick leave bank, any remaining time 
in the sick leave bank shall be transferred to the extended illness leave bank. Sick leave bank 
days shall not be used for absences unrelated to the illness or disability that necessitated the 
establishment of the sick leave bank as determined by the Department.